Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2712.04
Streamlined sales and use tax agreement; relationship to state law.

No provision of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement in whole or in part invalidates or amends any provision of the law of Nebraska. Adoption and ratification of the agreement by Nebraska does not amend or modify any law of Nebraska. Any provision of the agreement that is in conflict with state law, whether adopted before, at, or after membership of Nebraska in the agreement, shall be implemented by legislation or rule and regulation, as is appropriate.

Laws 2001, LB 172, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 76.